Illinois, session 104th, SB3324.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/7.5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1007.5)7    Sec. 7.5. Filing fees. 8    (a) The Board shall collect filing fees as prescribed in 9this Act. The fees shall be deposited in the Pollution Control 10Board Fund. The filing fees shall be as follows:11        Petition for site-specific regulation, $75.12        Petition for variance, $75.13        Petition for review of permit, $75.14        Petition to contest local government decision pursuant 15    to Section 40.1, $75.16        Petition for an adjusted standard, pursuant to Section 17    28.1, $75.18        Petition for a time-limited water quality standard, 19    $75 per petitioner.20    Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 21the 104th General Assembly, the Board may amend the filing 22fees through a rulemaking proceeding under Title VII of this 23Act.  SB3324- 2 -LRB104 13623 BDA 26251 b1    (b) A person who has filed a petition for a variance from a 2water quality standard and paid the filing fee set forth in 3subsection (a) of this Section for that petition and whose 4variance petition is thereafter converted into a petition for 5a time-limited water quality standard under Section 38.5 of 6this Act shall not be required to pay a separate filing fee 7upon the conversion of the variance petition into a petition 8for a time-limited water quality standard. 9(Source: P.A. 99-937, eff. 2-24-17.)